Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0510.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 396a. (1) Except as provided under subsection (2), a
federal immigration officer, while interacting with a member of the
public in the performance of the officer's duties, shall wear an
appropriate uniform and an activated body-worn camera and shall not
wear a mask or personal disguise.
(2) A federal immigration officer may wear a mask in any of
the following circumstances:
(a) To prevent the federal immigration officer from
contracting an airborne disease, the federal immigration officer
LEP S04048'25 (S-1) vx3gnp


may wear a mask that is designed to prevent the transmission of
airborne disease.
(b) To protect the federal immigration officer from airborne
toxins during a state of emergency, the federal immigration officer
may wear a mask that protects against exposure to the airborne
toxins during the state of emergency.
(c) The federal immigration officer may wear a mask that is
necessary to protect against exposure to a toxin, gas, smoke,
inclement weather during a declared weather emergency, or any other
hazardous or harmful environmental condition.
(3) A federal immigration officer who violates subsection (1)
is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more
than 90 days or a fine of not more than $500.00.
(4) This section does not apply to a federal immigration
officer engaged in an undercover assignment.
(5) As used in this section:
(a) "Appropriate uniform" means a uniform that displays the
federal immigration officer's name or badge number.
(b) "Body-worn camera" means a device that is worn by a
federal immigration officer that electronically records audio and
video of the federal immigration officer's activities.
(c) "Federal immigration officer" means an officer, employee,
or individual paid by or acting as an agent of the United States
Immigration and Customs Enforcement or United States Customs and
Border Protection, or any division thereof, or any other officer,
employee, or individual paid by or acting as an agent of the United
States Department of Homeland Security who is charged with
immigration enforcement.
(d) "Mask" includes, but is not limited to, a piece of
LEP S04048'25 (S-1) vx3gnp


nontransparent material meant to cover the face or conceal an
individual's identity that would otherwise be readily apparent.
Mask does not include a face shield that does not conceal the
wearer's face.
(e) "Undercover assignment" means any investigative activity
that involves the use of an assumed name or cover identity by a
federal immigration officer.
Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 90 days
after the date it is enacted into law.
Final Page
LEP S04048'25 (S-1) vx3gnp